Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Chapter 4. Privately Operated Correctional Facilities

§ 47-4-1.
Privately operated correctional facilities authorized for federal and other states’ inmates.

It is lawful for there to be located within Wilkinson County and Leflore County a correctional facility operated entirely by a private entity pursuant to a contractual agreement between such private entity and the federal government, any state, or a political subdivision of any state to provide correctional services to any such public entity for the confinement of inmates subject to the jurisdiction of such public entity. Any person confined in such a facility pursuant to the laws of the jurisdiction from which he is sent shall be considered lawfully confined within this state. The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for any illegal or tortious actions of such inmates.

The Department of Corrections shall contract with the Board of Supervisors of Leflore County for the private incarceration of not more than one thousand (1,000) state inmates at a facility in Leflore County. Any contract must comply with the requirements of Section 47-5-1211 through Section 47-5-1227.

It is lawful for any county to contract with a private entity for the purpose of providing correctional services for the confinement of federal inmates subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. Any person confined in such a facility pursuant to the laws of the United States shall be considered lawfully confined within this state. The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the county or the State of Mississippi, as the case may be, for any illegal or tortious actions of the inmates.

It is lawful for there to be located within any county a correctional facility operated entirely by a private entity and the federal government to provide correctional services to the United States for the confinement of federal inmates subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. Any person confined in a facility pursuant to the laws of the United States shall be considered lawfully confined within this state. The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for any illegal or tortious actions of the inmates.

A person convicted of simple assault on an employee of a private correctional facility while such employee is acting within the scope of his or her duty or employment shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

A person convicted of aggravated assault on an employee of a private correctional facility while such employee is acting within the scope of his or her duty or employment shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) years, or both.

The Department of Corrections may contract with the Tallahatchie County Correctional Facility authorized in Chapter 904, Local and Private Laws of 1999, for the private incarceration of not more than one thousand (1,000) state inmates at a facility in Tallahatchie County. Any contract must comply with the requirements of Section 47-5-1211 through Section 47-5-1227. No state inmate shall be assigned to the Tallahatchie County Correctional Facility unless the inmate cost per day is at least ten percent (10%) less than the inmate cost per day for housing a state inmate at a state correctional facility.

If a private entity houses state inmates, the private entity shall not displace state inmate beds with federal inmate beds unless the private entity has obtained prior written approval from the Commissioner of Corrections.

It is lawful for there to be located within Leflore County a correctional facility operated entirely by a private entity pursuant to a contractual agreement between such private entity and the federal government, the State of Mississippi, or Leflore County for the incarceration of federal inmates. Such correctional facility may include a separate Leflore County jail which may be located on or adjacent to the correctional facility site. To further the provisions of this subsection:

Any private entity, the State of Mississippi, or Leflore County may enter into any agreement regarding real property or property, including, but not limited to, a lease, a ground lease and leaseback arrangement, a sublease or any other lease agreement or arrangement, as lessor or lessee. Such agreements shall not exceed forty (40) years. The Department of Corrections may enter such agreements or arrangements on behalf of the State of Mississippi;

The powers conferred under this subsection shall be additional and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law. Where the provisions of this subsection conflict with other law, this subsection shall control; and

The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for any illegal or tortious actions of the inmates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 480, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2013.).

§ 47-4-3.
Prerequisites to establishment of privately operated correctional facilities; petition and election.

Before a private correctional facility may be located in the county, the board of supervisors shall by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes specify the location of the facility, the nature and size of the facility, the type of inmates to be incarcerated and the identity of the private entity which will operate the facility. The board shall publish a notice as hereinafter set forth in a newspaper having general circulation in such county. Such notice shall include location of the facility, the nature and size of the facility, the type of inmates to be incarcerated and the identity of the entity which will operate the facility. Such notice shall include a brief summary of the provisions of this section pertaining to the petition for an election on the question of the location of the private correctional facility in such county. Such notice shall be published not less than one (1) time each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in the county.

If a petition signed by twenty percent (20%), or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county is filed within sixty (60) days of the date of the last publication of the notice with the board of supervisors requesting that an election be called on the question of locating such facility, then the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution calling an election to be held within such county upon the question of the location of such facility. Such election shall be held, as far as practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties. At such election, all qualified electors of the county may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the facility to be constructed and the words “For the construction of the private correctional facility in (here insert county name) County” and “Against the construction of the private correctional facility in (here insert county name) County.” The voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition. When the results of the election on the question of the construction of the facility shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of the county and certified by them to the board of supervisors, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether or not a majority of the qualified electors who voted thereon in such election voted in favor of the construction of the facility in such county. If a majority of the qualified electors who voted in such election vote against the construction of the facility, then the facility shall not be constructed in the county.

If no petition as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section is filed with the board of supervisors within sixty (60) days of the date of the last publication of the notice, the board of supervisors shall by a resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, state that no petition was timely filed and the board may give final approval to the location of the facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 537, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 1992).

§ 47-4-5.
Agreements with private sources to operate juvenile detention centers.

Any local unit of government, or any local unit of government in cooperation with other local units of government, may enter into agreements with private sources for the operation and supervision of juvenile detention centers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 537, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 1992).

§ 47-4-7.
Authority, power and jurisdiction of private guards and jailers; escapees; penalties; pursuit and capture.

All private guards and jailers at private or public facilities shall have the same authority, power and jurisdiction as contractor’s employees under the Special Needs Prison Program of 1994, if they meet the minimum training requirements for state employees performing similar duties at public correctional and detention facilities.

Any inmate or person confined in a facility as provided for under subsection (1) of this section who escapes or attempts to escape from any such facility, and any person who aids or assists in such escape or attempted escape, shall be subject to the penalties as prescribed in Sections 97-9-25 through 97-9-49. Any guard or jailer at any such facility shall be authorized to pursue and assist in the capture of any such escapee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 581, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 47-4-9.
County may contract with private entity for operation of county jail.

The board of supervisors of any county, with the approval of the sheriff, may contract with a private entity for the management, operation and maintenance of a county jail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 540, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 2004.).

§ 47-4-11.
Amendment, extension and/or renewal of certain agreements in connection with private correctional facilities.

In order for the Mississippi Department of Corrections to manage funds budgeted and allocated in its Contractual Services budget category, the commissioner of the department shall have the authority to amend, extend and/or renew the term of any lease agreement or any inmate housing agreement in connection with a private correctional facility. Notwithstanding any statutory limits to the contrary, such amendment, extension and/or renewal may be for a length of time up to and including ten (10) years as is necessary for the continued operations of such facilities and implementation of the department’s duties and responsibilities in accordance with Title 47 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 490, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 7, 2010.).